Washington statutes.
RCW 2.30.110

Early childhood court programs—Judicial officer training.

(1) Judicial officers who preside over early childhood court program hearings shall participate in required trainings, as follows:

(a) An initial, eight-hour training program that can include the topic areas of:

(i) The benefits to infants and toddlers of secure attachment with primary caregivers;

(ii) A trauma-informed approach;

(iii) The importance of maintaining children within their biological connections;

(iv) The importance of reunification of children with their families;

(v) Diversity, equity, and inclusion; and

(vi) The impact of trauma on child development;

(b) After the initial training, annually attend a minimum of eight hours of continuing education of pertinence to the early childhood court program.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the administrative office of the courts shall administer the certification of training requirements.

[ 2021 c 285 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 285: See note following RCW 2.30.100.